Illinois, session 104th, SB3363.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Landlord and Tenant Act is amended by 5adding Sections 35, 40, and 45 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 705/35 new)7    Sec. 35. Rental fee transparency.8    (a) Each recurring nonoptional fee must be on the listing 9or an accompanying link to a website for the residential 10property and on the first page of the lease agreement in a 11clear and conspicuous manner as part of the total cost of the 12rent. If such a fee is not explicitly included in the cost of 13rent, a landlord may not charge the fee on a recurring basis, 14and the tenant is not liable for the fee on a recurring basis.15    (b) All one-time nonoptional fees must be detailed on the 16first page of a lease agreement in a clear and conspicuous 17manner. If a fee is not explicitly contained on the first page 18of a lease agreement, a landlord may not charge the fee, and 19the tenant is not liable for payment of the fee.20     21    (765 ILCS 705/40 new)22    Sec. 40. Renters Insurance. A landlord may not require a   SB3363- 2 -LRB104 18647 JRC 32090 b1tenant to acquire or maintain an insurance policy intended to 2provide coverage for damage or injury occurring in common 3areas of residential property. 4    (765 ILCS 705/45 new)5    Sec. 45. Penalties. Any person alleging a violation of the 6Landlord and Tenant Act may bring a civil action against a 7person or entity who is alleged to have violated any 8provisions of the Act seeking actual damages, injunctive 9relief, and attorney's fees and costs.